District of Columbia statutes.
10-802

Expenses of sale; deposit of net proceeds.

(a)

The Mayor is further authorized to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of sale of each parcel of land sold and shall deposit the net proceeds of the sale in the District Treasury.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, ch. 449, § 2
Sept. 11, 1990, D.C. Law 8-158,§ 2(b), 37 DCR 4167
Sept. 30, 1996, 110 Stat. 3009 1477, Pub. L. 104-208, § 5206(b)
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1003, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9063, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 98(c), 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-402.
1973 Ed., § 9-302.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “Except as provided in § 10-701(a), the Mayor” for “The Mayor”.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “sold and” for “sold and, the exception of the property mentioned in subsection (b) of this section,”; and repealed subsec. (b).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 added a comma preceding “with the exception” and following “of this section” “ in (b) [now repealed].

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Miner Building Conveyance Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-161, August 25, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6396).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Miner Building Conveyance Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-256, June 23, 1994, 41 DCR 4472).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1003 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).